South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S984.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 101, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-101-440.  (A) Each public and private institution of higher education in this State shall make opioid and fentanyl prevention education and awareness information available to enrolled students. Education may be provided in person or electronically and must include information on recognizing an opioid overdose, appropriate response including contacting emergency services, and the legal protections available to people who seek medical assistance or render aid in good faith pursuant to Section 15-1-310 and the South Carolina Overdose Prevention Act. (B) The information required by subsection (A) must be posted on a publicly accessible portion of each institution's internet website for viewing by students, parents, and legal guardians. (C) Each institution of higher education shall provide training on the administration of naloxone or other opioid overdose reversal medication to staff assigned to work in student residence halls. The training may be incorporated into existing training programs. (D) For the purpose of assisting a person at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose, an institution of higher education may obtain, possess, store, and maintain naloxone or other opioid overdose reversal medication pursuant to a standing order, statewide protocol, or other lawful mechanism authorized under the South Carolina Overdose Prevention Act, and may make the medication available for use in responding to a suspected overdose on property owned or controlled by the institution. (E) A person who, in good faith and in accordance with training, administers opioid overdose reversal medication pursuant to this section is entitled to the immunities and protections provided under Section 15-1-310 and the South Carolina Overdose Prevention Act. (F) For purposes of this section: (1) "Institution of higher education" means any public or private two-year or four-year college, university, technical college, or other postsecondary educational institution located in this State. (2) "South Carolina Overdose Prevention Act" means Chapter 130 of Title 44. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval of the Governor and applies beginning with the 2027-2028 Academic Year. ----XX----